North Carolina, session 2025, HB241.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the City of Roxboro for repairs and
upgrades to the City's wastewater and treatment plant.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of eight hundred thousand dollars ($800,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Person County to enable the
Recreation, Arts, and Parks Department to construct a splash pad.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Piedmont Community College to upfit
and purchase equipment for its Center for Health, Advanced Technology, and Trades.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H241-v-1*